California statutes. Public Utilities Code
(b) If the finding of the commission is set aside by the Supreme Court or the court of appeal of the State of California, the matter shall be referred back to the commission for further action in the proceeding before the commission, and the commission may, in taking further action, consider the entire testimony theretofore taken in the proceeding before the commission as well as further testimony presented in connection with the further action.

(c) If a writ of review is issued by the Supreme Court or court of appeal of the State of California, the time within which the political subdivision shall file an action in a court of competent jurisdiction or submit the proposition to its voters shall be extended to not more than 60 days beyond the final decision of the court upon that writ.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 855, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

1421.

The procedure provided in this chapter shall be alternative and cumulative and not exclusive, and the political subdivision shall continue to have the right to pursue any other procedure providing for the acquisition under eminent domain proceedings of the lands, property, and rights of any public utility. This chapter shall not be construed as repealing any law of this State providing for such eminent domain proceedings.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 8.5. Service Duplication [1501. - 1507.]

1501.

The Legislature recognizes the substantial obligation undertaken by a privately owned public utility which is franchised under the Constitution or by a certificate of public convenience and necessity to provide water service in that the utility must provide facilities to meet the present and prospective needs of those in its service area who may request service. At the same time, the rates that may be charged for water service by a regulated utility are fixed by the Public Utilities Commission at levels which assume that the facilities so installed will remain used and useful in the operation of the utility for a period of time measured by the physical life of such
 facilities.

The Legislature finds and declares that the potential loss of value of such facilities which may result from the construction and operation by a political subdivision of similar or duplicating facilities in the service area of such a private utility often deters such private utility from obtaining a certificate or extending its facilities to provide in many areas a water supply essential to the health and safety of the citizens thereof.

The Legislature further finds and declares that it is necessary for the public health, safety, and welfare that privately owned public utilities regulated by the state be compensated for damages that they may suffer by reason of political subdivisions extending their facilities into the service areas of such privately owned public utilities.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1752.)
-------------------------------------------

1502.

(a) As used in this chapter, “political subdivision” means a county, city and county, city, municipal water district, county water district, irrigation district, public utility district, California water district, or any other public corporation.

(b) As used in this chapter, “service area” means an area served by a privately owned public utility in which the facilities have been dedicated to public use and in which territory the utility is required to render service to the
 public.

(c) As used in this chapter, “operating system” means an integrated water system for the supply of water to a service area of a privately owned public utility.

(d) As used in this chapter, “private utility” means a privately owned public utility providing a water service.

(e) As used in this chapter, “type of service” means, among other things, domestic, commercial, industrial, fire protection, wholesale, or irrigation service.

(f) As used in this chapter, “reclaimed water” means reclaimed water as defined in Section 13050 of the Water Code.

(g) As used in this chapter, “private use” means an entity’s use of its own reclaimed water.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 859, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

1503.

The Legislature finds and declares that whenever a political subdivision constructs facilities to provide or extend water service, or provides or extends such service, to any service area of a private utility with the same type of service, such an act constitutes a taking of the property of the private utility for a public purpose to the extent that the private utility is injured by reason of any of its property employed in providing the water service being made inoperative, reduced in value or rendered useless to the private utility for the purpose of providing water service to the service area.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1975, Ch. 1240.)
-------------------------------------------

1504.

Just compensation for the property so taken for public purposes shall be as may be mutually agreed by the political subdivision and the private utility or as ascertained and fixed by a court of competent jurisdiction pursuant to the laws of this state relating to eminent domain, including consideration of the useful value to the political subdivision of the property so taken.

Whenever the compensation by a political subdivision under this section is an amount equal to the just compensation value of all the property of the private utility in the operating system that the private utility employs in providing water service to the service
 area, the political subdivision may, by resolution, provide for the acquisition of all such property.

A political subdivision engaged in activities set forth in Section 1503 shall pay just compensation for the property so taken for public purposes.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1752.)
-------------------------------------------

1505.

The provisions of Sections 1503 and 1504 will be applicable to any private utility which constructs facilities to provide or extend water service or provides or extends such service to any territory theretofore served by a political subdivision with the same type of service.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1752.)
-------------------------------------------

1505.5.

The provisions of Sections 1503 and 1504 will be applicable to any political subdivision which constructs facilities to provide or extend water service or provides or extends such service to any territory theretofore actually being lawfully served by any other political subdivision with facilities designed and constructed to provide the same type of service. The provisions of this section shall not apply to any territory, or portion thereof, which is the subject of any final judgment or litigation pending on the effective date of this section involving any duplication of water service occurring prior to the effective date of this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 1973, Ch. 997.)
-------------------------------------------

1506.

(a) As used in this chapter, “private utility” includes a mutual water company. In its application to mutual water companies, this chapter affects and relates only to the property, or portion of any property, of a mutual water company that is employed by the company in providing water service in or for a territory that is actually being provided with water service by the company when a political subdivision constructs facilities to provide or extend water service or provides or extends the service to the territory, and that
 territory shall constitute the “service area” of a mutual water company as used in Section 1502.

(b) Subject to the preservation of rights of a mutual water company in subdivision (c), this section does not apply to a political subdivision that constructs facilities to provide or extend recycled water service to the territory of the mutual water company, if the political subdivision complies with the Water Recycling Act of 1991 (Chapter 7.5 (commencing with Section 13575) of Division 7 of the Water Code).

(c) The exception in subdivision (b), for a political subdivision that constructs facilities to provide or extend recycled water service to the territory of the mutual water company, does not apply to those customers and their properties to which the mutual water company was providing recycled water service, or for whom the mutual water company has identified and developed specific plans to provide recycled water service, as of December 31, 2014.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 817, Sec. 1.   (AB 2443)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

1507.

This chapter shall not be applicable if all of the following conditions are met:

(a) The use is limited to the private use of reclaimed water by an entity that owns a water reclamation plant.

(b) The use is limited to the premises of a water reclamation plant or landfill owned by the entity that owns or operates the water reclamation plant.

(c) The use is limited to dust suppression, and irrigation purposes, and
 other uses on the site for which reclaimed water has been approved by the State Department of Health Services.

(d) No existing reclaimed water facilities, whether owned or operated by a private utility or political subdivision, can reasonably and economically serve the intended use.

(e) If reclaimed water is used on the premises of a landfill, the entity provides appropriate compensation to the private utility or political subdivision for those facilities directly used for the water services being replaced by reclaimed water service. Appropriate compensation shall not include valuations based on revenues lost by the private utility or political subdivision due to replacement of water service with reclaimed water.

(f) This section shall apply only in Los Angeles County.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 859, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 8.7. School Energy Efficiency Stimulus Program [1600. - 1640.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Provisions and Definitions  [1600. - 1601.]

1600.

The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(a) The School Energy Efficiency Stimulus Program, established pursuant to Section 1610, is intended to save energy, create jobs in a time of economic crisis, and provide direct support to schools and school children in underserved communities.

(b) The combined extraordinary crises of the COVID-19 pandemic and the economic recession require mustering all possible state resources to protect our most vulnerable populations while also bolstering the economy as a whole.

(c) There is no program in California dedicated to
 improving ventilation and energy efficiency in California schools at the scale required to safely prepare schools for operating during the COVID-19 pandemic. This program is vitally needed to protect the health, safety, and ability to learn for California’s school children and the health of California’s teachers.

(d) There is no program in California dedicated to replacing old, inefficient plumbing fixtures that waste potable water (and the energy needed to treat and convey that water) and that have high lead content that can leach into student’s drinking water. This program is needed to replace inefficient fixtures and appliances in schools, which would save approximately 6 billion gallons of water a year and protect student health.

(e) It is the intent of the Legislature to
 advance high-quality jobs in underserved communities by increasing demand for skilled workers to implement this work.

(f) The School Energy Efficiency Stimulus Program is an urgent energy efficiency measure. This program will reduce energy use in schools that otherwise would result from repairs and upgrades to school ventilation systems that are necessary to meet current classroom ventilation requirements and applicable COVID-19 school reopening guidance. This program will also replace old, out-of-date fixtures and hot-water appliances that waste significant amounts of water and energy compared to the standards required for current fixtures and appliances. All ratepayers will benefit from the reduction in system load resulting from this program.

(History: Added by Stats. 2020, Ch. 372, Sec. 5.   (AB 841)   Effective January 1, 2021.   Repealed as of January 1, 2031, pursuant to Section 1640.)
-------------------------------------------

1601.

For purposes of this chapter, the following terms have the following meanings:

(a) “Local educational agency” means a school district as defined in Section 41302.5 of the Education Code, a charter school that has been granted a charter pursuant to Part 26.8 (commencing with Section 47600) of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Education Code, or a regional occupational center established pursuant to Section 52301 of the Education Code that is operated by a joint powers authority and that has an active career technical education advisory committee pursuant to Section 8070 of the Education Code.

(b) “SRVEVR Program” means the School Reopening Ventilation and Energy Efficiency Verification and Repair Program as specified in Article 3 (commencing with Section 1620).

(c) “Skilled and trained
 workforce” has the same meaning as set forth in Section 2601 of the Public Contract Code.

(d) “SNPFA Program” means the School Noncompliant Plumbing Fixture and Appliance Program as specified in Article 4 (commencing with Section 1630).

(e) “Underserved community” means a community that meets one of the following criteria:

(1) Is a “disadvantaged community” as defined by subdivision (g) of Section 75005 of the Public Resources Code.

(2) Is included within the definition of “low-income communities” as defined by paragraph (2) of subdivision (d) of Section 39713 of Health and Safety Code.

(3) Is within an area identified as among the most disadvantaged 25 percent in the state according to
 the California Environmental Protection Agency and based on the most recent California Communities Environmental Health Screening Tool, also known as CalEnviroScreen.

(4) Is a community in which at least 75 percent of public school students in the project area are eligible to receive free or reduced-price meals under the National School Lunch Program.

(5) Is a community located on lands belonging to a federally recognized California Indian tribe.

(f) “Utility” or “utilities” means both of the following:

(1) An electrical corporation with 250,000 or more customer accounts within the state.

(2) A gas corporation with 400,000 or more customer accounts within the
 state.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 77, Sec. 29.   (AB 137)   Effective July 16, 2021.   Repealed as of January 1, 2031, pursuant to Section 1640.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. School Energy Efficiency Stimulus Program [1610. - 1618.]

1610.

By no later than February 1, 2021, the utilities shall file a joint advice letter pursuant to Section 5.1 of General Order 96-B, to fund a joint School Energy Efficiency Stimulus Program as part of each of their energy efficiency portfolios. The School Energy Efficiency Stimulus Program shall be a joint program among all the participating utilities that shall be consistent across the utility territories and shall be designed, administered, and implemented by the Energy Commission as the program administrator. The commission shall approve the advice letter no later than March 1, 2021. The School Energy Efficiency Stimulus Program shall consist of both of the following programs:

(a) The School Reopening Ventilation and Energy Efficiency Verification and Repair Program as specified in Article 3 (commencing with Section 1620).

(b) The School Noncompliant Plumbing Fixture and Appliance Program as specified in Article 4 (commencing with Section 1630).

(History: Added by Stats. 2020, Ch. 372, Sec. 5.   (AB 841)   Effective January 1, 2021.   Repealed as of January 1, 2031, pursuant to Section 1640.)
-------------------------------------------

1611.

Each utility shall work with the Energy Commission to ensure the SRVEVR Program and SNPFA Program are operative and begin to solicit applications for grants on or before April 1, 2021, and begin to approve applications no later than May 1, 2021, subject to the availability of funds.

(History: Added by Stats. 2020, Ch. 372, Sec. 5.   (AB 841)   Effective January 1, 2021.   Repealed as of January 1, 2031, pursuant to Section 1640.)
-------------------------------------------

1612.

Not less than 25 percent of projects funded by the SRVEVR Program or SNPFA Program shall be in underserved communities. The SRVEVR Program and SNPFA Program shall prioritize underserved communities by ensuring that all schools that are in an underserved community are offered the opportunity to apply for and receive grants before those schools that are not in an underserved community. Additionally, the SRVEVR Program shall prioritize schools with a boundary that is within 500 feet of the edge of the closest traffic lane of a freeway or other busy traffic corridor or within 1,000 feet of a facility holding a permit pursuant to Title V of the Clean Air Act (42 U.S.C. Section 7661 et seq.). For the purposes of this section, “freeway or other busy
 traffic corridors” has the same meaning as defined in paragraph (9) of subdivision (d) of Section 17213 of the Education Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2020, Ch. 372, Sec. 5.   (AB 841)   Effective January 1, 2021.   Repealed as of January 1, 2031, pursuant to Section 1640.)
-------------------------------------------

1613.

The SRVEVR Program and the SNPFA Program shall be considered a third-party program for compliance with the commission Decision 16-08-019 (August 18, 2016) Decision Providing Guidance for Initial Energy Efficiency Rolling Portfolio Business Plan Filings.

(History: Added by Stats. 2020, Ch. 372, Sec. 5.   (AB 841)   Effective January 1, 2021.   Repealed as of January 1, 2031, pursuant to Section 1640.)
-------------------------------------------

1614.

(a) The Energy Commission, in collaboration with each utility, shall adopt guidelines and regulations for the SRVEVR Program and the SNPFA Program.

(b) The Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code) does not apply to the adoption of guidelines or regulations pursuant to this section.

(c) The Energy Commission shall adopt regulations or guidelines no later than May 1, 2021, and shall begin approving applications
 promptly upon their adoption.

(d) Other than the workforce qualification requirements, the technical and reporting requirements of the SRVEVR Program as set forth in Sections 1623 through 1627 of Article 3 (commencing with Section 1620) may be amended by the Energy Commission pursuant to subdivisions (a) and (b) of this section, as necessary, to reflect the latest COVID-19 or other applicable guidance, or otherwise to achieve the intent of the SRVEVR Program and to ensure consistency with related requirements and codes.

(e) The technical definitions in Section 1620 or 1630 may be amended by the Energy
 Commission, as necessary, to achieve the intent of the School Energy Efficiency Stimulus Program and to ensure consistency with related requirements and codes.

(History: Added by Stats. 2020, Ch. 372, Sec. 5.   (AB 841)   Effective January 1, 2021.   Repealed as of January 1, 2031, pursuant to Section 1640.)
-------------------------------------------

1615.

(a) (1) The commission shall require each utility to fund the School Energy Efficiency Stimulus Program by allocating their energy efficiency budgets for program years 2021, 2022, and 2023, in both of the following amounts:

(A) An amount equal to the applicable percentage of the difference between the budget contained in each utility’s 2020 annual budget advice letter approved as of July 1, 2020, and the annual portfolio funding limitation for program year 2020 as set forth in the 2018–2025 business plan of each utility as approved and modified in ordering paragraph 45 of the commission’s Decision 18-05-041 (May 31, 2019) Decision Addressing Energy Efficiency Business Plans, as modified by Decision 20-02-029 (February 6, 2020) Order Modifying
 Decision (D.) 18-05-041 and Denying Rehearing of Decision, as Modified. The applicable percentage is 80 percent for program year 2021, 70 percent for program year 2022, and 60 percent for program year 2023.

(B) Any carryover amount from unspent and uncommitted energy efficiency funds for program year 2020, 2021, or 2022 to the School Energy Efficiency Stimulus Program for the following year’s budget.

(2) Funding allocations required by this subdivision shall only apply to program years 2021, 2022, and 2023.

(3) Any funds allocated towards the School Energy Efficiency Stimulus Program pursuant to this section that remain unspent by the end of each program year may be carried over and contribute to the next year’s budget for the School Energy Efficiency Stimulus Program until the end of the 2023 energy efficiency
 program year.

(b) (1) This section does not authorize the levy of a charge or any increase in the amount collected pursuant to an existing charge beyond the amounts authorized by the commission in Decision 18-05-041, or as modified by Decision 20-02-029, nor does it add to, or detract from, any existing authority of the commission to levy or increase charges.

(2) This subdivision does not change the commission’s authority to determine revenue allocation and rate design, including its ability to prioritize customers participating in the California Alternative Rates for Energy or Family Electric Rate Assistance programs when considering appropriate revenue allocation for energy efficiency programs.

(c) The Energy Commission shall ensure that moneys from each utility for the School Energy
 Efficiency Stimulus Program are used for projects located in the service territory of that utility from which the moneys are received.

(d) The Energy Commission may use no more than 5 percent, not to exceed five million dollars ($5,000,000) per year, of the SRVEVR Program and the SNPFA Program funds for administrating the programs, including providing technical support to program participants. The commission shall ensure that funds allocated to the Energy Commission pursuant to this section are transferred to an account specified by the Energy Commission within 60 days after the completion of the prior energy efficiency program year.

(e) (1) The School Energy Efficiency Stimulus Program Fund was administratively established for the Energy Commission to receive funds allocated pursuant to this chapter.

(2) Notwithstanding Section 13340 of the Government Code, the moneys in the School Energy Efficiency Stimulus Program Fund are hereby continuously appropriated to the Energy Commission without regard to fiscal years for the purposes of the School Energy Efficiency Stimulus Program established pursuant to this chapter, including, but not limited to, paying the costs of program administration.

(f) (1) Notwithstanding all funds allocated in subdivision (d), all non-committed funds allocated in subdivision (a) shall be spent or returned to each utility by December 1, 2026.

(2) Any funds committed as of August 31, 2026, shall be encumbered by December 1, 2028, liquidated by December 1, 2029, and returned to each utility by January 30, 2030.

(g) The Energy Commission may set application
 and encumbrance deadlines to ensure that the reversion of funds is consistent with subdivision (f).

(h) The Energy Commission shall take steps, consistent with Section 25230 of the Public Resources Code, to ensure that a diverse group of contractors are aware of funding opportunities available through the School Energy Efficiency Stimulus Program.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 259, Sec. 11.   (SB 193)   Effective September 18, 2026.   Repealed as of January 1, 2031, pursuant to Section 1640.)
-------------------------------------------

1616.

Moneys for the School Energy Efficiency Stimulus Program for each program year shall be allocated as follows:

(a) Seventy-five percent to the SRVEVR Program.

(b) Twenty-five percent to the SNPFA Program.

(History: Added by Stats. 2020, Ch. 372, Sec. 5.   (AB 841)   Effective January 1, 2021.   Repealed as of January 1, 2031, pursuant to Section 1640.)
-------------------------------------------

1617.

The School Energy Efficiency Stimulus Program advances the public interest in maximizing cost-effective energy savings and related public benefits, including ensuring that ratepayer investments unlock deeper energy savings and benefit underserved communities. Because the commission’s current cost-effectiveness methodology does not fully take into account indirect and nonmonetary public benefits, that methodology shall not be applied to these projects. Expenditures on the School Energy Efficiency Stimulus Program shall be found to be cost effective and shall not be considered by the commission when calculating the overall cost-effectiveness of energy efficiency portfolios of electrical corporations or gas
 corporations.

(History: Added by Stats. 2020, Ch. 372, Sec. 5.   (AB 841)   Effective January 1, 2021.   Repealed as of January 1, 2031, pursuant to Section 1640.)
-------------------------------------------

1618.

Reducing emissions of greenhouse gases and energy savings attributed to a project funded by the School Energy Efficiency Stimulus Program shall be attributed to the utility that provided those funds when determining compliance with applicable greenhouse gas or energy efficiency saving mandates. The baseline for determining reductions in emissions of greenhouse gases and energy savings from the SRVEVR Program shall be the energy demand and emissions of greenhouse gases that would have occurred if ventilation and filtration recommendations for reopening schools were met without the assessment, adjustment, maintenance, repairs, and efficiency upgrades funded pursuant to the program.

(History: Added by Stats. 2020, Ch. 372, Sec. 5.   (AB 841)   Effective January 1, 2021.   Repealed as of January 1, 2031, pursuant to Section 1640.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. School Reopening Ventilation and Energy Efficiency Verification and Repair Program [1620. - 1627.]

1620.

For purposes of this article, the following definitions apply:

(a) “Certified TAB Technician” means a technician certified to perform testing, adjusting, and balancing of HVAC systems by the Associated Air Balance Council (AABC), the National Environmental Balancing Bureau (NEBB), or the Testing, Adjusting and Balancing Bureau (TABB).

(b) “HVAC” means heating, ventilation, and air conditioning.

(c) “Licensed Professional” means a professional eligible under Division 3 (commencing with Section 5000) of the Business and Professions Code in the applicable
 classification, to perform system design, construction, or installation of features, materials, components, or manufactured devices for mechanical systems.

(d) “MERV” means minimum efficiency reporting value.

(e) “ppm” means parts per million.

(f) “Program” means the School Reopening Ventilation and Energy Efficiency Verification and Repair Program.

(g) “Qualified adjusting personnel” means either of the following:

(1) A certified testing, adjusting, and balancing (TAB) technician.

(2) A skilled and trained workforce under the supervision
 of a TAB Technician.

(h) “Qualified testing personnel” means either of the following:

(1) An HVAC acceptance test technician certified to complete the forms set forth in subparagraph (B) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 10-103.2 of Part 1 of Title 24 of the California Code of Regulations by an Acceptance Test Technician Certification Provider (ATTCP) that is approved by the Energy Commission to provide that certification.

(2) A certified testing, adjusting and balancing (TAB) technician.

(i) “TAB” means testing, adjusting, and balancing.

(History: Added by Stats. 2020, Ch. 372, Sec. 5.   (AB 841)   Effective January 1, 2021.   Repealed as of January 1, 2031, pursuant to Section 1640.)
-------------------------------------------

1621.

(a) The Energy Commission, in collaboration with each utility, shall develop and administer the School Reopening Ventilation and Energy Efficiency Verification and Repair Program to award grants to local educational agencies to reopen schools with functional ventilation systems that are tested, adjusted, and, if necessary or cost effective, repaired, upgraded, or replaced to increase efficiency and performance.

(b) A local educational agency may apply for a grant pursuant to the program by submitting an application for reasonable costs of the HVAC assessment, assessment report, general maintenance, adjustment of ventilation rates, filter replacement, and carbon dioxide
 monitor installation.

(c) (1) The Energy Commission shall award a grant pursuant to this article if the amount requested in the application is verified by a contractor’s estimate and the local educational agency meets other requirements determined by the Energy Commission to be appropriate to achieve the purposes of this article. A grant shall be awarded in the amount requested plus an additional 20 percent of the requested amount for repairs, upgrades, or replacements necessary to make the system functional or more energy efficient.

(2) If a licensed professional identifies cost-effective energy efficiency upgrades or repairs that would exceed the additional 20 percent awarded, a local educational agency may apply for additional funding pursuant to this
 article for the cost-effective energy efficiency upgrades or repairs.

(3) The Energy Commission shall award a grant pursuant to this article for reimbursement of work already performed where the work was contracted and performed after August 1, 2020, and meets the requirements of Section 1622 to 1627, inclusive, and the local educational agency meets other requirements determined by the Energy Commission to be appropriate to achieve the purposes of this article.

(4) The 20-percent contingency funds set forth in paragraph (1) shall be returned to the SRVEVR Program if not used for the purposes specified in this subdivision. The local education agency shall provide the Energy Commission with documentation, as specified by the Energy Commission, demonstrating how contingency funds
 were spent.

(5) The Energy Commission shall have the authority to establish the timing of grant funding, including the ability to provide some or all funding in advance of the performance of work where requirements to ensure performance are established.

(History: Added by Stats. 2020, Ch. 372, Sec. 5.   (AB 841)   Effective January 1, 2021.   Repealed as of January 1, 2031, pursuant to Section 1640.)
-------------------------------------------

1622.

As conditions for receiving a grant pursuant to this article, a local educational agency shall comply with the requirements of Sections 1623 to 1627, inclusive, for all air-handling units, rooftop units and unitary and single zone equipment in that facility’s HVAC system or systems.

(History: Added by Stats. 2020, Ch. 372, Sec. 5.   (AB 841)   Effective January 1, 2021.   Repealed as of January 1, 2031, pursuant to Section 1640.)
-------------------------------------------

1623.

(a) (1) The local educational agency receiving a grant shall install filtration with a minimum efficiency reporting value (MERV) of 13 or better in the local educational agency’s HVAC system where feasible. Qualified testing personnel shall review system capacity and airflow to determine the highest MERV filtration that can be installed without adversely impacting equipment, shall replace or upgrade filters where needed, and shall verify that those filters are installed correctly. If a system uses ultraviolet germicidal irradiation (UVGI) to disinfect the air, the UVGI lamp shall be checked for proper operation, replacing bulbs as needed and verifying that the ultraviolet light does not shine on filters.
 Recommendations for additional maintenance, replacement, or upgrades to allow for more protective filtration shall be recorded in the assessment report required pursuant to Section 1626.

(2) For systems with economizers, qualified testing personnel shall test system economizer dampers pursuant to Section B of NRCA-MCH-05-A–Air Economizer Controls. Economizer dampers and controls that are not properly functioning shall be repaired by a skilled and trained workforce. Recommendations for additional maintenance, replacement, or upgrades shall be recorded in the assessment report.

(b) (1) After completing the requirements of subdivision (a), a qualified testing personnel shall verify the ventilation rates in the facility classrooms, auditoriums, gymnasiums, nurses
 offices, restrooms, and other occupied areas to assess whether they meet the minimum ventilation rate requirements set forth in Table 120.1-A of Part 6 (commencing with Section 100.0) of Title 24 California Code of Regulations. Assessment shall include all of the following:

(A) Calculation of the required minimum outside air ventilation rates for each occupied area based on the anticipated occupancy and the minimum required ventilation rate per occupant set forth in Table 120.1-A. Calculations shall be based on maximum anticipated classroom or other occupied area occupancy rates and determined by the performing technician. Natural Ventilation shall be designed in accordance with Section 402.2 of the California Mechanical Code (Part 4 (commencing with Section 1.1.0) of Title 24 of the California Code of Regulations) and shall include mechanical
 ventilation systems designed in accordance with Section 403.0, Section 404.0, or both of those sections, of the California Mechanical Code.

(B) Measurement of outside air pursuant to Section B of
 NRCA-MCH-02-A–Outdoor Air Acceptance and verification of whether the system provides the minimum outside air ventilation rates calculated in subparagraph (A).

(C) Survey readings of inlets and outlets to verify all ventilation is reaching the served zone and that there is adequate distribution. Verify if inlets and outlets are balanced within tolerance of the system design. Document read values and deficiencies. If the original system design values are not available, document available information and note unavailability of system design values in the assessment report.

(D) Verification of building pressure relative to the outdoors to ensure positive pressure differential and to ensure the building is not over pressurized.

(E) Verification of coil velocities and coil and unit discharge air temperatures required to maintain desired indoor conditions and to avoid moisture carry over from cooling coils.

(F) Verification that separation between outdoor air intakes and exhaust discharge outlets meet requirements of the California Building Code.

(G) Confirmation that the air handling unit is bringing in outdoor air and removing exhaust air as intended by the system design.

(H) Measurement of all exhaust air volume for exhaust fans, including restrooms. Document any discrepancies from system design.

(2) If the system does not
 meet the minimum ventilation rate requirements set forth in Table 120.1-A, a licensed professional or qualified adjusting personnel shall review the system airflow and capacity to determine if additional ventilation can be provided without adversely impacting equipment performance and building indoor environmental quality. If additional ventilation can be provided, a qualified adjusting personnel shall adjust ventilation rates to meet the minimum ventilation rate requirements set forth in Table 120.1-A to the extent feasible. After the adjustment, the measurement and versifications required in subparagraphs (B), (D), and (E) of paragraph (1) shall be repeated. If minimum ventilation rate requirements set forth in Table 120.1-A cannot be met, this deficiency shall be reported in the assessment report and the verification report, and addressed by a licensed professional as required pursuant to
 Sections 1626 and 1627.

(c) If a demand control ventilation is installed, it shall be adjusted to a carbon dioxide set point of 800 ppm or less and tested by a qualified testing personnel pursuant to Section B of NRCA-MCH-06-A–Demand Control Ventilation Systems Acceptance. If the demand control ventilation system does not maintain average daily maximum carbon dioxide levels below 1,100 ppm, it shall be disabled until such time as the local educational agency determines that the COVID-19 crisis has passed, unless disabling the control would adversely affect operation of the overall system. When disabling a demand control ventilation system, the system must be configured to meet the minimum ventilation rate requirements and tested and adjusted in accordance with paragraph (3) of subdivision (a) of Section 1625. Recommendations
 for additional maintenance, replacement or upgrades shall be recorded in the assessment report.

(d) A qualified testing personnel or a skilled and trained workforce shall verify coil condition, condensate drainage, cooling coil air temperature differentials (entering and leaving dry bulb), heat exchanger operation, and drive assembly. If repairs, replacement, or upgrades are necessary, these deficiencies shall be reported in the assessment report and the verification report, and addressed by the licensed professional pursuant to Sections 1626 and 1627.

(e) A qualified testing personnel or qualified adjusting personnel shall do all of the following:

(1) Review control sequences to verify systems will maintain intended
 ventilation, temperature and humidity conditions during school operation. Previously unoccupied buildings shall perform the recommended practices of reopening a building as covered in the American Society of Heating, Refrigerating and Air-Conditioning Engineers (ASHRAE) Building Readiness document – Restarting a Building.

(2) Verify a daily flush is scheduled for two hours before and after scheduled occupancy or demonstrate calculation of flush times per ASHRAE Guidance for Reopening and Operating Schools and Buildings or otherwise applicable local or state guidance. 

(3) Verify that HVAC system operational times, exhaust fans operation times, setpoints, and enabled features meet ASHRAE Guidance for Reopening and Operating Schools and Buildings or otherwise applicable
 local or state guidance. 

(f) Requirements for filtration levels, ventilation rates, and ventilation schedules may be amended by the Energy Commission based on the latest COVID-19 or other applicable guidance.

(History: Added by Stats. 2020, Ch. 372, Sec. 5.   (AB 841)   Effective January 1, 2021.   Repealed as of January 1, 2031, pursuant to Section 1640.)
-------------------------------------------

1624.

If installed HVAC systems or system components are broken, fail to meet minimum ventilation requirements, or are unable to operate to the original design and intent, this information will be set forth in the assessment report prepared pursuant to Section 1626 to be provided to a licensed professional for determination of appropriate corrective measures pursuant to Section 1626. Repairs, upgrades, or replacements shall be performed by a skilled and trained workforce.

(History: Added by Stats. 2020, Ch. 372, Sec. 5.   (AB 841)   Effective January 1, 2021.   Repealed as of January 1, 2031, pursuant to Section 1640.)
-------------------------------------------

1625.
